Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-1902
Definitions, where found.

For purposes
of the Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Assessment Act, the definitions
found in sections 68-1903 to 68-1916 apply.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 2.